Wyoming statutes. Title 18 Counties
Chapter 6 Courthouses and Jails

Cross references. —

For duty of county to provide a suitable courthouse and jail, see §

18-2-103

.

As to joint city and county buildings, see §

18-2-104

.

For authority of county to issue bonds for construction of a courthouse and jail, see §

18-4-302

.

As to sale of land upon foreclosure of lien in connection with water rights on lands under Carey Act at courthouse, see §

36-7-504

.

As to sale of state lands at door of courthouse of county in which land is situated, see §

36-9-106

.

Am. Jur. 2d, ALR and C.J.S. references. —

56 Am. Jur 2d Municipal Corporations, Counties, etc. §§ 44, 168, 189, 193 to 195, 532 to 559.

20 C.J.S. Counties §§ 165, 166, 167; 72 C.J.S. Prisons §§ 1 to 29.